Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 21 Olive Oil

21-21-1.
“Olive oil” defined.

“Olive oil,” means the pale yellowish or yellowish green nondrying oil expressed from ripe olives and used or sold or offered for sale as a salad oil, in cooking, or as a lubricant or in illumination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1016, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-21-1

.

21-21-2.
Sale of mixtures as pure olive oil prohibited.

Olive oil, when it has been mixed or packed with cotton seed oil or other substance, shall not be sold or offered for sale under the name of “Pure olive oil.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1016, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-21-2

.

21-21-3.
Penalties for misrepresentation — Confiscation — Evidence — Action on contract.

Every person, firm, or corporation who as principal or by servant or agent shall have in his or her or its possession or who shall pack, label, and distribute to be sold or shall offer for sale any can, jar, package, or other container which is stamped or labeled or which is caused to be stamped or labeled as containing pure olive oil, which stamp or label falsely represents the olive oil to be pure when it has been mixed or packed with cotton seed oil or other substance, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and for the first and second offense shall be punished by a fine of not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200), and for the third and each subsequent offense shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment for thirty (30) days or by both fine and imprisonment, and the olive oil shall be confiscated and shall become the property of the state for final distribution; and on trial of the offense proof of the possession, packing, labeling, or distributing to be sold or offering for sale, shall be evidence of knowledge of the character of the article possessed, packed, labeled, and distributed for sale or offered for sale and of knowledge that it was not pure olive oil as required by §

21-21-2

. No action shall be maintained in any court of this state to recover on any contract for packing, labeling, and distributing for sale of olive oil so misrepresented as being pure olive oil as required by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1016, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

21-21-3

.

21-21-4.
Prosecution of violations.

It shall be the duty of the department of health to prosecute any person, firm, or corporation violating any of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1016, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

21-21-4

.

21-21-5.
Access to premises — Taking and analysis of specimens.

The director of health or the director’s officer or agent may enter any place where olive oil is packed, labeled, distributed, or offered for sale for the purpose of examining into any suspected violation of §§

21-21-2

and

21-21-3

; and whenever the director has reason to believe that any olive oil is being packed, labeled, distributed, or offered for sale in violation of §§

21-21-2

and

21-21-3

, he or she shall take specimens of the oil and cause the specimens to be analyzed or satisfactorily tested, the result of which he or she shall record and preserve as evidence, and a certificate of the result, sworn to by the analyzer, shall be admissible in evidence in all prosecutions under this chapter. Every person refusing the director or other officer or agent responsible entry for the purpose of examination, or refusing to allow him or her to take specimens, shall, upon conviction, be fined a sum not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1016, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

21-21-5

.

21-21-6.
Sale of mixed oils so labeled.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall prevent the sale of olive oil, which has been mixed with cotton seed oil or other substance when the can, jar, package, or container in which the mixed olive oil is so stamped or labeled.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1016, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

21-21-6

.